Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-105
Militia; classes, defined.

The militia of this state shall be divided into two classes, the active and the reserve militia. The active militia shall consist of the organized and uniformed military forces of the state, which shall be known as the Nebraska National Guard, which includes the Army National Guard and the Air National Guard. The reserve militia shall consist of all those liable to service in the militia, but not serving in the National Guard of this state.

Laws 1909, c. 90, § 3, p. 365;

R.S.1913, § 3902;

C.S.1922, § 3300;

C.S.1929, § 55-104;

R.S.1943, § 55-107;

Laws 1953, c. 188, § 5, p. 595;

R.R.S.1943, § 55-107;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 3, p. 1582.

In preparing for and holding annual encampment, Nebraska National Guard is a state governmental agency within meaning of workmen's compensation law, and is liable to employee for compensation for injuries. Nebraska National Guard v. Morgan, 112 Neb. 432, 199 N.W. 557 (1924).